Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE B. DRIVER'S LICENSES AND PERSONAL IDENTIFICATION CARDS

CHAPTER 525. MOTORCYCLE AND BICYCLE AWARENESS

Sec. 525.001. MOTORCYCLE AND BICYCLE AWARENESS. (a) In this section, "motorcycle" has the meaning assigned that term by Section 502.001, and includes a motorcycle equipped with a sidecar.

(b) The Department of Public Safety shall include motorcycle and bicycle awareness information in any edition of the Texas driver's handbook published after the department exhausts the supply of the handbook that the department had on September 1, 1993.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.